Hawaii, session 2026, HB1911.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 710-1040, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (1) to read as follows: "(1)  A person commits the offense of bribery if: (a)  The person confers, or offers or agrees to confer, directly or indirectly, any pecuniary benefit upon a public servant [with]: (i) With the intent to influence the public servant's vote, opinion, judgment, exercise of discretion, or other action in the public servant's official capacity; or (ii)  Because of any action previously taken by the public servant in the public servant's official capacity; or (b)  While a public servant, the person solicits, accepts, or agrees to accept, directly or indirectly, any pecuniary benefit [with]: (i)  With the intent that the person's vote, opinion, judgment, exercise of discretion, or other action as a public servant will thereby be influenced[.]; or (ii)  Because of any action previously taken by the public servant in the public servant's official capacity." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________